apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON V-PERS-PRES ! P_6

!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>м V-CLIT ; 
!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>@D.NEG.1@т V-CLIT-OTHER ; 
!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>@D.NEG.1@ V-CLIT-BI ; 
!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>б%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
!¶@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
!¶%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>т V-CLIT-OTHER ; 
!¶%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> V-CLIT-BI ; 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т V-CLIT-OTHER ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> V-CLIT-BI ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]:%>т V-CLIT-OTHER ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> V-CLIT-BI ; 

!LEXICON V-PERS-IMPER ! P_6


LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON

V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ;
!¶@P.NEG.1@:%>%{I%}ш@P.NEG.1@ V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ; ! Dir/LR
%[%-coop%]:%>%{I%}ш V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ; ! Dir/LR
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ;

LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND

V-INFL-FINITE ;
!¶@D.NEG.1@:@D.NEG.1@ V-INFL-NON-FINITE ; 

V-INFL-NON-FINITE ; 

%<asif%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;
%<asif%>%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;

LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE

V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;


LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG

! Participles
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;     ! no negative form
! %<prc_real%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
!%<neg%>%<prc_real%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{E%} # ;
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{E%} # ;
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} # ; ! CLIT-GANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_ala%>:%>м%{A%}й%{I%}нч%{A%} # ;       ! no negative form  ! rare IS
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;


! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only ?
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р GER-INFL ;                        ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%с GER-INFL ;              !
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}с GER-INFL ;          ! Dir/LR

!! Affirmative forms with л{I}к may exist?
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                     ! Dir/LR
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                ! Dir/LR

!! Forms with only one {A} should be analysed
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р GER-INFL ;                              ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                ! Dir/LR

!! Forms with two {A}s should be generated
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;


! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-ADJ ;                            ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;                  !
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}с V-ADJ ;              ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<gpr_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с V-ADJ ;

!! Forms with only one {A} should be analysed
%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р GER-INFL ;                              ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                ! Dir/LR

!! Forms with two {A}s should be generated
%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;




LEXICON IMP
!!! Stuff that can come after imperative forms !!!

CLIT-CHI ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-CHI

%+чы%<emph%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;


LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG

! %<plist%>:%>м%{A%}й # ;                                       ! huh? "-mAj is used mainly for listing"

! Participles
! %<prc_prp%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} # ;  ! rare IS
! - changed to prc_plan 2014-08-16 JNW
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ;   ! rare IS
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-COND ;

! Participles used with copulas
%<prc_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н # ; ! used with <cop><ifi> or бол<v><iv> forms for different tense/aspect
!%<prc_fplan%>:%>м%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;    !  бармай болдум - I decided to go
!%<ger_hab%>%<nom%>:%>м%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;   ! this is actually not a participle: it takes copula verbs and can be a subject:
%<prc_hab%>:%>м%{A%}й # ;   ! used with copulas
                                                !  бармай болдум - I decided to go, бармай мага жакпайт - I don't like going all the time
                                                ! but it only has the nominal unpossessed form
%<prc_fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р # ;  ! used with copulas
%<prc_fut%>:%>%{A%}р # ;       ! Dir/LR
%<prc_irre%>:%>%{E%}т # ;
%<prc_pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к # ;    ! in -мАк эле- etc.
%<prc_fplan%>:%>м%{A%}кч%{I%} # ;    ! in -мАкчы бол- etc.



! Verbal adverbs
! %<gna_prp%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} # ;  ! rare IS
! - changed to gna_after 2014-08-16 JNW
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-COND ;

! Gerunds
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ; ! <coop> IS only ?
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-INFL ; !
%<ger_pres%>:%>%{I%}ш GER-INFL ;    ! <coop> IS only
%<ger%>:%>%{U%}%{U%} GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only
%<ger_abst%>:%>%{U%}%{U%}%>ч%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only
%<ger_unac%>:%>%{E%}% элек GER-INFL ;

! Verbal adjectives 
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay
%<gpr%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay  ! both past (or perf?) and general
%<gpr_hab%>:%>ч%{U%} V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay
!%<vadj_impf%>:%>%{E%}% турган V-ADJ ;       ! Done already by <prt_impf> тур<vaux><vadj_past>
%<gpr_pot%>:%>%{U%}%{U%}%>ч%{U%} V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_unac%>:%>%{E%}% элек V-ADJ ;

!  Imperatives

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: IMP ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р IMP ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з IMP ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң IMP ;                      ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>%{L%}%{A%}р IMP ;

!  Optative/jussive forms

%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н V-CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н V-CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}л%{I%} V-CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}йл%{I%} V-CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}л%{I%}к V-CLIT ; ! Dir/LR  
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}йл%{I%}к V-CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]:%>с%{I%}н V-CLIT ;


LEXICON V-INFL-FINITE

! Regular finite forms
V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

! Irregular finite forms
V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;


LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;                                     !
%<aor%>%<evid%>:%>%{E%}%>т% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                 !

! evidential recent past
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}пт%{I%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                  
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-COP-SUF-NOP3 ;                    ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Verbs
кел%<v%>%<iv%>%<prc_impf%>%+жат%<vaux%>:келат V-INFL-COMMON ;  ! Dir/LR
бар%<v%>%<iv%>%<prc_impf%>%+жат%<vaux%>:барат V-INFL-COMMON ;  ! Dir/LR
